California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
(c) The department shall implement the provisions of Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800), Part 3.2 (commencing with Section 5830), Part 3.6 (commencing with Section 5840), and Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850) through the county mental health services performance contract, as specified in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 5650) of Part 2.

(d) The department shall conduct program reviews of performance contracts to determine compliance. Each county performance contract shall be reviewed at least once every three years, subject to available funding for this purpose.

(e) When a county mental health program is not in compliance with its performance contract, the department may request a plan of correction with a
 specific timeline to achieve improvements. The department shall post on its internet website any plans of correction requested and the related findings.

(f) Contracts awarded by the State Department of Health Care Services, the State Department of Public Health, the California Behavioral Health Planning Council, the Office of Statewide Health Planning and Development, and the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission pursuant to Part 3 (commencing with Section 5800), Part 3.1 (commencing with Section 5820), Part 3.2 (commencing with Section 5830), Part 3.6 (commencing with Section 5840), Part 3.7 (commencing with Section 5845), Part 4 (commencing with Section 5850), and Part 4.5 (commencing with Section 5890), may be awarded in the same manner in which contracts are awarded pursuant to Section 5814 and the provisions of subdivisions (g) and (h) of Section 5814 shall apply to those contracts.

(g) For purposes of Section 14712, the allocation of funds pursuant to Section 5892 that are used to provide services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries shall be included in calculating anticipated county matching funds and the transfer to the State Department of Health Care Services of the anticipated county matching funds needed for community mental health programs.

(h) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 104) by Stats. 2025, Ch. 243, Sec. 20.   (SB 862)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    See later operative version added by Sec. 105 of Stats. 2023, Ch. 790.)
-------------------------------------------

5897.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other state law, the State Department of Health Care Services shall implement the programs and services specified in subdivision (a) of Section 5892, and related activities, through contracts with a county or counties acting jointly.

(2) A contract may be exclusive and may be awarded on a geographic basis.

(3) For purposes of this section, a “county” includes a city receiving funds pursuant to Section 5701.5.

(b) (1) Two or more counties acting jointly may agree to deliver or
 subcontract for the delivery of programs and services pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 5892.

(2) The agreement may encompass all or part of these programs and services.

(3) An agreement between counties shall delineate each county’s responsibilities and fiscal liability.

(c) The department shall contract with counties, or counties acting jointly pursuant to subdivision (a), through the county performance contract as specified in Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 5650) of Part 2.

(d) (1) The department shall conduct program reviews of performance contracts to determine compliance, including compliance with Sections 5963.02 and
 5963.04.

(2) Each county performance contract shall be reviewed at least once every three years, subject to available funding for this purpose.

(e) (1) If a county behavioral health department is not in compliance with its performance contract, the department may request a plan of correction with a specific timeline to achieve improvements and take administrative action, including, but not limited to, the temporary withholding of funds and the imposition of monetary sanctions pursuant to Section 5963.04.

(2) The department shall post plans of correction requested and the related findings on its internet website.

(f) Contracts awarded by
 the State Department of Health Care Services, the State Department of Public Health, the California Behavioral Health Planning Council, the Department of Health Care Access and Information, the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission and the California Health and Human Services Agency to implement programs and services set forth in subdivision (a) of Section 5892 and programs pursuant to Part 3.1 (commencing with Section 5820) may be awarded in the same manner that contracts are awarded pursuant to Section 5814, and the provisions of subdivisions (g) and (h) of Section 5814 shall apply to those contracts.

(g) For purposes of Section 14712, the allocation of funds pursuant to Section 5892 that are used to provide services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries shall be included in calculating anticipated county matching
 funds and the transfer to the State Department of Health Care Services of the anticipated county matching funds needed for community mental health programs.

(h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2026, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 104) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 105.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5898.

(a) (1) The State Department of Health Care Services shall develop regulations, as necessary, to implement this act.

(2) Regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall be developed with the maximum feasible opportunity for public participation and comments.

(b) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2025, if amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 106) and added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 790, Sec. 107.   (SB 326)   Effective April 17, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.     Operative January 1, 2025, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

5899.

(a) (1) The State Department of Health Care Services, in consultation with the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission and the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, shall develop and administer instructions for the Annual Mental Health Services Act Revenue and Expenditure Report.

(2) The instructions shall include a requirement that the county certify the accuracy of this report.

(3) With the exception of expenditures and receipts related to the capital facilities and technology needs component described in paragraph (6) of subdivision (d), each county shall adhere to uniform accounting standards and procedures that conform to the
 Generally Accepted Accounting Principles prescribed by the Controller pursuant to Section 30200 of the Government Code when accounting for receipts and expenditures of Mental Health Services Act (MHSA) funds in preparing the report.

(4) Counties shall report receipts and expenditures related to capital facilities and technology needs using the cash basis of accounting, which recognizes expenditures at the time payment is made.

(5) Each county shall electronically submit the report to the department and to the Behavioral Health Services Oversight and Accountability Commission.

(6) The department and the commission shall annually post each county’s report in a text-searchable format on its internet website in a timely manner.

(b) The department, in
 consultation with the commission and the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California, shall revise the instructions described in subdivision (a) by July 1, 2017, and as needed thereafter, to improve the timely and accurate submission of county revenue and expenditure data.

(c) The purpose of the Annual Mental Health Services Act Revenue and Expenditure Report is as follows:

(1) Identify the expenditures of MHSA funds that were distributed to each county.

(2) Quantify the amount of additional funds generated for the mental health system as a result of the MHSA.

(3) Identify unexpended funds and interest earned on MHSA funds.

(4) Determine reversion amounts, if applicable,
 from prior fiscal year distributions.

(d) This report is intended to provide information that allows for the evaluation of all of the following:

(1) Children’s systems of care.

(2) Prevention and early intervention strategies.

(3) Innovative projects.

(4) Workforce education and training.

(5) Adults and older adults systems of care.

(6) Capital facilities and technology needs.

(e) If a county does not submit the annual revenue and expenditure report described in subdivision (a) by the required
 deadline, the department may withhold MHSA funds until the reports are submitted.

(f) A county shall also report the amount of MHSA funds that were spent on mental health services for veterans.

(g) By October 1, 2018, and by October 1 of each subsequent year, the department shall, in consultation with counties, publish on its internet website a report detailing funds subject to reversion by county and by originally allocated purpose. The report also shall include the date on which the funds will revert to the Behavioral Health Services Fund.

(h) If amendments to the Mental Health Services Act are approved by the voters at the March 5, 2024, statewide primary election, this section shall become inoperative on July 1, 2026, and as of January 1, 2027, is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 243, Sec. 21.   (SB 862)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Inoperative July 1, 2026, by its own provisions.    Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.    Note: Amended in Prop. 1 at the March 5, 2024, election.)
-------------------------------------------

5899.1.

(a) On or after July 1, 2017, funds subject to reversion pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 5892 shall be reallocated to other counties for the purposes for which the unspent funds were initially allocated to the original county.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department, without taking any further regulatory action, may implement, interpret, or make specific this section, Section 5892.1, and subdivision (h) of Section 5892, by means of all-county letters or other similar instructions, until applicable regulations are adopted in accordance with Section 5898, or until July 1, 2019, whichever occurs first. The all-county letters or other similar
 instructions shall be issued only after the department provides the opportunity for public participation and comments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2017, Ch. 38, Sec. 16.   (AB 114)   Effective July 10, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 5. INSTITUTIONS FOR MENTAL DISEASE [5900. - 5912.]



  CHAPTER 1. General Provisions [5900. - 5912.]



  ARTICLE 1. Legislative Findings and Intent [5900. - 5901.]

5900.

This part is intended to organize and finance mental health services in skilled nursing facilities designated as institutions for mental disease, in a way that will promote the well-being of the residents. It is furthermore intended to effectively utilize existing resources in the delivery of mental health services to persons with a severe and persistent mental health condition, to ensure continued receipt of federal funds, to minimize the fiscal exposure of counties, to maintain state responsibility for licensing and certification, to maintain services to individual county consumers at the 1990–91 fiscal year levels, and to provide a mechanism for the orderly transition of programmatic and fiscal responsibility from the
 state to the counties, in a way that will maintain the stability and viability of the industry.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 58.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5901.

(a) The Legislature finds that the following issues relating to program operation must be resolved prior to the full assumption of responsibility for institutions for mental disease program monitoring and reimbursement procedures by the counties:

(1) The information regarding the program is inadequate to accurately allocate funding to the counties without significant disruption of patient care.

(2) There is currently no administrative mechanism whereby all counties can immediately assume these responsibilities without endangering the health and safety of the persons being served.

(b) (1) During the 1991–92 fiscal year, the sum of eighty-seven million seven hundred twenty-seven thousand dollars ($87,727,000) shall be made available from the Mental Health Subaccount of the Sales Tax Account of the Local Revenue Fund to the department for support of institutions for mental disease.

(2) For the 1991–92 fiscal year, the department shall issue a preliminary allocation of at least fifty-seven million four hundred fifty thousand dollars ($57,450,000) of the amount identified in paragraph (1). In developing a preliminary allocation, the department shall utilize a methodology that will minimize disruption of services to persons being served and that will continue access at the 1990–91 fiscal year level.

(3) During the 1991–92 fiscal year, the department shall administer institution for mental disease resources remaining from the amount identified in
 paragraph (1) after the allocation described in (2) has been made, as a risk pool on behalf of all the counties. Effective July 1, 1991, the department shall enter into contracts with institutions for mental disease providers at the 1990–91 fiscal year contract bed level. These resources shall be made available to all counties.

(4) The department shall establish a method for the identification of persons, by county, residing in institutions for mental disease, and notification of counties of their program and fiscal responsibilities.

(c) The Department of Finance may authorize a loan of up to twenty million dollars ($20,000,000) from the General Fund for deposit into the Institutions for Mental Disease Account of the Mental Health Facilities Fund established pursuant to Section 17602.05, for use by the
 department in implementing this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 34, Sec. 210.   (SB 1009)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Interim Contracting Mechanism [5902. - 5903.5.]

5902.

(a) In the 1991–92 fiscal year, funding sufficient to cover the cost of the basic level of care in institutions for mental disease at the rate established by the State Department of Health Care Services shall be made available to the department for skilled nursing facilities, plus the rate established for special treatment programs. The department may authorize a county to administer institutions for mental disease services if the county with the consent of the affected providers makes a request to administer services and an allocation is made to the county for these services. The department shall continue to contract with these providers for the services necessary for the operation of the institutions for mental disease.

(b) In the 1992–93 fiscal year, the
 department shall consider county-specific requests to continue to provide administrative services relative to institutions for mental disease facilities when no viable alternatives are found to exist.

(c) (1) By October 1, 1991, the department, in consultation with the County Behavioral Health Directors Association of California and the California Association of Health Facilities, shall develop and publish a county-specific allocation of institutions for mental disease funds that will take effect on July 1, 1992.

(2) By November 1, 1991, counties shall notify the providers of any intended change in service levels to be effective on July 1, 1992.

(3) By April 1, 1992, counties and providers shall have entered into contracts for basic institutions for mental disease services at the rate described
 in subdivision (e) for the 1992–93 fiscal year at the level expressed on or before November 1, 1991, except that a county shall be permitted additional time, until June 1, 1992, to complete the processing of the contract, when any of the following conditions are met:

(A) The county and the affected provider have agreed on all substantive institutions for mental disease contract issues by April 1, 1992.

(B) Negotiations are in process with the county on April 1, 1992, and the affected provider has agreed in writing to the extension.

(C) The service level committed to on November 1, 1991, exceeds the affected provider’s bed capacity.

(D) The county can document that the affected provider has refused to enter into negotiations by April 1, 1992, or has
 substantially delayed negotiations.

(4) If a county and a provider are unable to reach agreement on substantive contract issues by June 1, 1992, the department may, upon request of either the affected county or the provider, mediate the disputed issues.

(5) When contracts for service at the level committed to on November 1, 1991, have not been completed by April 1, 1992, and additional time is not permitted pursuant to the exceptions specified in paragraph (3) the funds allocated to those counties shall revert for reallocation in a manner that shall promote equity of funding among counties. With respect to counties with exceptions permitted pursuant to paragraph (3), funds shall not revert unless contracts are not completed by June 1, 1992. In no event shall funds revert under this section if there is no harm to the provider as a result of the county contract not being completed.
 During the 1992–93 fiscal year, funds reverted under this paragraph shall be used to purchase institution for mental disease/skilled nursing/special treatment program services in existing facilities.

(6) Nothing in this section shall apply to negotiations regarding supplemental payments beyond the rate specified in subdivision (e).

(d) On or before April 1, 1992, counties may complete contracts with facilities for the direct purchase of services in the 1992–93 fiscal year. Those counties for which facility contracts have not been completed by that date shall be deemed to continue to accept financial responsibility for those patients during the subsequent fiscal year at the rate specified in subdivision (a).

(e) As long as contracts with institutions for mental disease providers require the facilities to maintain
 skilled nursing facility licensure and certification, reimbursement for basic services shall be at the rate established by the State Department of Health Care Services. Except as provided in this section, reimbursement rates for services in institutions for mental diseases shall be the same as the rates in effect on July 31, 2004. Effective July 1, 2005, through June 30, 2008, the reimbursement rate for institutions for mental disease shall increase by 6.5 percent annually. Effective July 1, 2008, the reimbursement rate for institutions for mental disease shall increase by 4.7 percent annually.

(f) (1) Providers that agree to contract with the county for services under an alternative mental health program pursuant to Section 5768 that does not require skilled nursing facility licensure shall retain return rights to licensure as skilled nursing facilities.

(2) Providers participating in an alternative program that elect to return to skilled nursing facility licensure shall only be required to meet those requirements under which they previously operated as a skilled nursing facility.

(g) In the 1993–94 fiscal year and thereafter, the department shall consider requests to continue administrative services related to institutions for mental disease facilities from counties with a population of 150,000 or less based on the most recent available estimates of population data as determined by the Demographic Research Unit of the Department of Finance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 142.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

5903.

(a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions shall apply:

(1) “Client” means an individual who is all of the following:

(A) A person with a mental health disability.

(B) Medi-Cal eligible.

(C) Under 65 years of age.

(D) Certified for placement in an institution for mental disease by a county.

(E) Eligible for Supplemental
 Security Income/State Supplementary Program for the Aged, Blind, and Disabled (SSI/SSP) benefits.

(2) “Client’s payee” means an authorized representative who may receive revenue resources, including SSI/SSP benefits, on behalf of a client.

(3) “SSI/SSP benefits” means revenue resources paid to an eligible client, or the client’s payee, by the federal Social Security Administration pursuant to Subchapter 16 (commencing with Section 1381) of Chapter 7 of Title 42 of the United States Code, and Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 12000) of Part 3 of Division 9.

(b) (1) Between August 1, 1991, and June 30, 1992, institution for mental disease providers shall make reasonable efforts to collect SSI/SSP
 benefits from a client or a client’s payee. The provider shall invoice the client or the client’s payee for the SSI/SSP benefits, minus the personal and incidental allowance amount as established by the Social Security Administration, and remit all SSI/SSP funds collected to the department pursuant to procedures established by the department.

(2) Commencing July 1, 1992, and to the extent permitted by federal law, institution for mental disease providers may collect SSI/SSP benefits from a client or a client’s payee. The amount to be invoiced shall be the amount of the client’s SSI/SSP benefits, minus the personal and incidental allowance amount as established by the Social Security Administration. The administrative
 mechanism for collection of SSI/SSP benefits, including designation of the party responsible for collection, shall be determined by negotiation between the counties and the providers.

(c) In collecting SSI/SSP benefits from the client or the client’s payee, the provider shall not be deemed to be the authorized representative, as defined in Section 72015 of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations, for purposes of handling the client’s moneys or valuables.

(d) Providers shall make all reasonable efforts, as specified in procedures developed by the department in consultation with providers, to collect SSI/SSP benefits from the client or the client’s payee. Providers shall establish an accounting procedure, approved by the department, for the actual collection and
 remittance of these funds.

(e) Providers shall prorate the client’s SSI/SSP benefits by the number of days spent in the facility.

(f) After June 30, 1992, and not later than January 1, 1993, the department shall make data available to the Legislature, upon request, regarding the SSI/SSP collections made by institution for mental disease providers pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 59.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5903.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the department may liquidate accounts receivable from individual clients or payees of clients from institution for mental disease funds appropriated by the Legislature, when they have been determined by the department to be uncollectible, including accounts receivable in existence prior to the effective date of this section. Liquidation shall occur no sooner than 12 months after the original date of the accounts receivable debt.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 918, Sec. 2.   Effective October 14, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Procedures for the Transfer of Responsibility from the State to the Counties [5907. - 5912.]

5907.

No later than January 1, 1992, the director, in consultation with the California Conference of Local Mental Health Directors and representatives of institutions for mental disease, shall develop a suggested uniform contract format that may be used by counties for the purchase of services from institutions for mental disease.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 198.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5908.

On or before October 1, 1992, and in each following year, the counties contracting directly with the facility shall inform the facility of any intent to modify the quantity of services to be purchased in the subsequent fiscal year. Contracts for these services shall be completed by April 1 of each year for the following year. In the absence of cause, changes shall not be made without this notification.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 198.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5909.

(a) The Director of Health Care Services shall retain the authority and responsibility to monitor and approve special treatment programs in skilled nursing facilities in accordance with Sections 72443 to 72475, inclusive, of Title 22 of the California Code of Regulations.

(b) The State Department of Health Care Services shall conduct annual certification inspections of special treatment programs for persons with a mental health disability for the purpose of approving the special treatment programs that are located in skilled nursing facilities licensed pursuant to Section 1265 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 948, Sec. 60.   (AB 2119)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

5910.

Nothing in this article shall preclude two or more counties from establishing a single agreement with a facility, or group of facilities, for the purchase of services for the counties as a single entity. When two or more counties enter into an agreement, a single county may act as the host county for the purpose of program management and administration.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 198.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5911.

A county or group of counties, by agreement, may expand services into additional facilities utilizing any funds available to the county or counties for that purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 89, Sec. 198.   Effective June 30, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

5912.

(a) As long as contracts require institutions for mental disease to continue to be licensed and certified as skilled nursing facilities by the State Department of Public Health, they shall be reimbursed for basic services at the rate established by the State Department of Health Care Services. Effective July 1, 2014, the reimbursement rate for institutions for mental disease shall increase by 3.5 percent annually.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that the annual rate increases provided in subdivision (a) be utilized by the institutions for mental disease to meet direct service costs and, to the extent possible, improve the quality of care rendered to residents in the facilities.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), beginning July 1, 2017, in any year that the Mental Health Subaccount of the Local Revenue Fund does not receive full vehicle license fee growth funds from the General Growth Subaccount in the Vehicle License Fee Growth Account pursuant to Section 17604 and subdivisions (a) and (b) of Section 17606.20, the reimbursement rate for services in institutions for mental disease that are licensed and certified as skilled nursing facilities shall be the same as the rates in effect in the prior year.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2017, Ch. 25, Sec. 10.   (SB 90)   Effective June 27, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 7. Behavioral Health Services and Supports [5960. - 5967.01.]



  CHAPTER 1. Behavioral health continuum infrastructure program [5960. - 5960.4.]

5960.

The department may establish the Behavioral Health Continuum Infrastructure Program pursuant to this chapter if the Legislature appropriates funds for this purpose.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 355.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 5960.45.)
-------------------------------------------

5960.05.

If the department establishes the program pursuant to this chapter, the department may award competitive grants to qualified entities to construct, acquire, and rehabilitate real estate assets or to invest in needed mobile crisis infrastructure to expand the community continuum of behavioral health treatment resources to build new capacity or expand existing capacity for short-term crisis stabilization, acute and subacute care, crisis residential, community-based mental health residential, substance use disorder residential, peer respite, mobile crisis, community and outpatient behavioral health services, and other clinically enriched longer term treatment and rehabilitation options for persons with behavioral health disorders in the least restrictive and least costly setting.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 355.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 5960.45.)
-------------------------------------------

5960.1.

Except as provided in Section 5960.15, the department shall determine the methodology and distribution of the grant funds appropriated for the program pursuant to Section 5960.05 to those entities it deems qualified.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 355.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 5960.45.)
-------------------------------------------

5960.15.

An entity shall meet all of the following conditions in order to receive grant funds pursuant to Section 5960.05, to the extent applicable and as required by the department:

(a) Provide matching funds or real property.

(b) Expend funds to supplement and not supplant existing funds to construct, acquire, and rehabilitate real estate assets.

(c) Report data to the department within 90 days of the end of each quarter for the first five years.

(d) Operate services in the financed facility for the intended purpose for a minimum of 30 years.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 355.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 5960.45.)
-------------------------------------------

5960.2.

(a) This chapter shall be implemented only if, and to the extent that, the department determines that federal financial participation under the Medi-Cal program, including but not limited to the increased federal funding available pursuant to Section 9813 of the federal American Rescue Plan Act of 2021 (Pub. Law 117-2), is not jeopardized.

(b) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may implement, interpret, or make specific this chapter, in whole or in part, by means of information notices or other similar instructions, without taking any further regulatory action.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 355.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 5960.45.)
-------------------------------------------

5960.25.

For purposes of implementing this chapter, the department may enter into exclusive or nonexclusive contracts, or amend existing contracts, on a bid or negotiated basis. Contracts entered into or amended pursuant to this section shall be exempt from Chapter 6 (commencing with section 14825) of Part 5.5 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, Section 19130 of the Government Code, Part 2 (commencing with Section 10100) of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code, and the State Administrative Manual, and shall be exempt from the review or approval of any division of the Department of General Services.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 355.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 5960.45.)
-------------------------------------------

5960.3.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, a facility project funded by a grant pursuant to this chapter shall be deemed consistent and in conformity with any applicable local plan, standard, or requirement, and allowed as a permitted use, within the zone in which the structure is located, and shall not be subject to a conditional use permit, discretionary permit, or to any other discretionary reviews or approvals.

(b) Notwithstanding any other law, the California Environmental Quality Act (Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code) shall not apply to a project, including a phased project, funded by a grant pursuant to this chapter if, where applicable, all of the following applicable requirements are
 satisfied:

(1) The project is not acquired by eminent domain.

(2) The project applicant demonstrates that the project is, and will continue to be, licensed by and in good standing with the department or other state licensing entity at the time of, and for the duration of, occupancy. The project shall be in decent, safe, and sanitary condition at the time of occupancy.

(3) The project applicant requires all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the facility project to pay prevailing wages for any proposed rehabilitation, construction, or major alterations in accordance with Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(4) The project applicant obtains an enforceable commitment that all contractors and
 subcontractors performing work on the project will use a skilled and trained workforce for any proposed rehabilitation, construction, or major alterations in accordance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(5) The project applicant submits to the lead agency a letter of support, or other durable documentary proof for the project, from a county, city, or other local public entity for any new proposed construction, major alteration work, or rehabilitation.

(6) The project applicant demonstrates that not less than ninety-five percent of the total cost of any new construction, facility acquisition, or rehabilitation project is paid for with public funds, private non-profit funds, or philanthropic funds.

(7) The project applicant demonstrates that the project
 expands the availability of behavioral health treatment services in the subject jurisdiction.

(8) The project applicant demonstrates that there are long-term covenants and restrictions that require the project to be used to provide behavioral health treatment for no less than 30 years, and those covenants and restrictions may not be amended or extinguished by a subsequent title holder, owner, or operator.

(9) The project does not result in any increase in the existing onsite development footprint of structures or improvements.

(c) If a project applicant determines that a project is not subject to the California Environmental Quality Act pursuant to this section, and the lead agency for the project publicly concurs in that determination, the project applicant shall file a notice of exemption with the Office of
 Planning and Research and the county clerk of the county in which the project is located in the manner specified in subdivisions (b) and (c) of Section 21152 of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 143, Sec. 355.   (AB 133)   Effective July 27, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, pursuant to Section 5960.45.)
-------------------------------------------

5960.31.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, projects funded pursuant to paragraph (3) or (4) of subdivision (b) of Section 5965.04 shall be a use by right and shall be subject to the streamlined, ministerial review
 process and filing requirement, pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (d) of Section 50675.1.5 of the Health and Safety Code, and not subject to a conditional use permit, discretionary permit, or to any other discretionary reviews or approvals, if it meets the criteria of paragraph (1) or (2) and complies with subdivisions (b) and (c).

(1) The project is a behavioral health treatment and residential setting, including, but not limited
 to, children’s residential crisis programs, peer respite, children’s and adult substance use disorder residential programs, recovery housing, short-term residential therapeutic program, and social rehabilitation program, and shall be located in a zone where residential, office, retail, or parking are a principally permitted use.

(2) (A) The project is a real estate asset, as described in Section 5960.05, except for those described in paragraph (1), or in subparagraph (A) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 5831, that is funded pursuant to Section 5967.01, and
 shall be located in a zone where office, retail, or parking are a principally permitted use.

(B) This paragraph shall not be construed to limit the discretion of local jurisdictions to permit real estate assets in a zone not expressly provided in this paragraph.

(b) Projects, as applicable, pursuant to this
 section shall comply with the core components of Housing First, as defined under subdivision (b) of Section 8255, and may include recovery housing, as defined by the United States Department of Housing and Urban Development.

(c) Projects pursuant to this section shall meet the labor standards contained in Sections 65912.130 and 65912.131 of the Government Code.

(d) For purposes of this section, “use by right” means a development project that satisfies both of the following conditions:

(1) The development project does not require a conditional use permit, planned unit development permit, or other discretionary local government review.

(2) The development project is not a “project” for purposes of Division 13 (commencing with Section 21000) of the Public Resources Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 789, Sec. 2.   (AB 531)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

5960.35.

(a) The following definitions shall apply to this chapter:

(1) “Department” means the State Department of Health Care Services.

(2) “Program” means the Behavioral Health Continuum Infrastructure Program authorized by this chapter.

(b) The following provisions shall apply to the implementation of this chapter:

(1) “Low-rent housing project,” as defined in Section 1 of Article XXXIV of the California Constitution, does not apply to any facility project pursuant to this section that meets any one of the following criteria:

(A) The development is privately owned housing, receiving no ad valorem property tax exemption, other than exemptions granted pursuant to subdivision (f) or (g) of Section 214 of the Revenue and Taxation Code, not fully reimbursed to all taxing entities, and not more than 49 percent of the dwellings, apartments, or other living accommodations of the development may be occupied by persons of low income.
